Utah statutes.
10-9a-211.   Canal owner or operator -- Notice to municipality.

(1)  For purposes of Subsection 10-9a-509(1)(b)(iv), a canal company or a canal operator shall provide on or before July 1, 2010, any municipality in which the canal company or canal operator owns or operates a canal:

(a)  a current mailing address and phone number;

(b)  a contact name; and

(c)  a general description of the location of each canal owned or operated by the canal owner or canal operator.

(2)  If the information described in Subsection (1) changes after a canal company or a canal operator has provided the information to the municipality, the canal company or canal operator shall provide the correct information within 30 days of the day on which the information was changed.



Enacted by Chapter 332, 2010 General Session

